Massachusetts, session 194th, H3537.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 30A of the General Laws, as appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10A the following section:
“Section 10B. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10, in any adjudicatory
proceeding regarding any petition, request for approval or investigation of a gas company or
electric company, as those terms are defined in section 1 of chapter 164, the following shall be
permitted to participate as full parties in the proceeding:
(1) any municipality that is within the service area of such company;
of 2

(2) any member of the general court whose district includes ratepayers of such company;
and
(3) any group of not less than 10 persons who are ratepayers of the company.
of 2